Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-302.01
Children; golf caddy; exempt from provisions of section.

Section 48-302 shall not be construed to apply to the employment of any child solely as a caddy on any golf course or place where golf is played.

Laws 1961, c. 237, § 1, p. 700;

Laws 1987, LB 35, § 1.